en: Chocolate eggs
bg: Шоколадови яйца
da: Chokoladeæg
de: Schokoladeneier
es: Huevos de chocolate
fi: suklaamunia
fr: Oeufs en chocolat, Oeuf en chocolat
hr: Čokoladna jaja
hu: Csokoládé tojás
it: Uovo di Cioccolato
lt: Šokoladiniai kiaušiniai
nl: Chocolade eieren
sv: Chokladägg

en: Milk chocolate molds
es: Moldes de chocolate con leche
fr: Moulages en chocolat au lait
hr: Kalupi za mliječnu čokoladu
it: Stampi di cioccolato al latte
lt: Pieniški šokolado formos
nl: Melkchocoladevormen, Melkchocolade figuren

en: Milk chocolate bar
fi: Maitosuklaalevyt
fr: Tablette de chocolat au lait, Chocolat au lait en tablette
hr: Štanglica mliječne čokolade
lt: Pieniškos šokolado plytelės, pieniška šokolado plytelė

en: Milk chocolates with sweeteners
bg: Млечен шоколад с подсладители
de: Milchschokolade mit Süßstoffen
fr: Chocolats au lait édulcorés, Chocolats au lait aux édulcorants
hr: Mliječne čokolade sa zaslađivačima
hu: Tejes csokoládék édesítőszerekkel
it: Cioccolato al latte con edulcorante
lt: Pieniški šokoladai su saldikliais
nl: Melkchocolade met zoetstoffen
pt: Chocolates de leite com adoçantes

en: Milk chocolate bar without sugar with sweeteners
fr: Chocolat au lait en tablette sans sucres ajoutés avec édulcorants
hr: Mliječna čokolada bez šećera sa zaslađivačima
lt: Pieniškos šokolado plytelės be cukraus su saldikliais

en: Liqueur chocolates
bg: Шоколад с ликьор
de: Schokoladen mit Likör, Likörschokoladen
fi: Liköörisuklaat
fr: Chocolats à la liqueur
hr: Liker čokolade
hu: Likőrös csokoládék
lt: Šokoladai su likeriu
nl: Chocola met likeur

en: Chocolates with extra fine milk
de: Schokoladen mit extrafeiner Milch
fr: Chocolats au lait extra fin, chocolat au lait extra fin
hr: Čokolade s ekstra finim mlijekom
hu: Csokoládék extra finom tejjel
lt: Šokoladai su itin geru pienu
nl: Chocola met extra fijne melk

en: Rice milk chocolates
fr: Chocolats au lait au riz
hr: Čokolade od rižinog mlijeka
it: Cioccolato al latte con riso
lt: Ryžių pieno šokoladai
nl: Chocolade-rijstmelk

en: Puffed cereal milk chocolates, Milk chocolate bar with puffed cereals, Milk chocolate bar with popped cereals
fr: Chocolats au lait aux céréales croustillantes, Chocolat au lait en tablette aux céréales croustillantes
hr: Lisnate mliječne čokolade od žitarica
it: Cioccolato al latte con cereali
lt: Pieniško šokolado plytelės su pūstais dribsniais
nl: Melkchocolade met granen

en: Chocolates with almonds
bg: Бадемови шоколади, шоколади с бадеми
de: Schokoladen mit Mandeln
es: Chocolates con almendras
fi: mantelisuklaat
fr: Chocolats aux amandes, chocolats avec amandes, chocolat avec amandes
hr: Čokolade s bademima
hu: Mandulás csokoládék
it: Cioccolato alle mandorle
ja: アーモンドチョコレート
lt: Šokoladai su migdolais
nl: Amandelchocoladen
pt: Chocolates com amêndoas
ru: Шоколад с миндалём
sv: Choklad med mandlar, choklad med mandel
tr: Bademli çikolata

en: Milk chocolate bar with nougat, Toblerone
es: Barra de chocolate con leche y nougat, Toblerone
fr: Barre de chocolat au lait avec nougat, Toblerone
hr: Pločica mliječne čokolade s nugatom
it: Tavoletta di cioccolato al latte con torrone, Toblerone
lt: Pieno šokolado plytelė su nugatu, Toblerone
nl: Melkchocoladereep met nougat, Toblerone
pt: Barra de chocolate de leite com nougat, Toblerone

en: Chocolates with hazelnuts
bg: Лешникови шоколади, шоколади с лешници
de: Schokolade mit Haselnüssen
es: Chocolates con avellanas
fi: hasselpähkinäsuklaat
fr: Chocolats aux noisettes
he: שוקולדים עם אגוזי לוז
hr: Čokolade s lješnjacima
hu: Csokoládé mogyoróval
it: Cioccolato alle nocciole
ja: ヘーゼルナッツチョコレート
lt: Šokoladai su lazdynais
nl: Chocola met hazelnoten
pt: Chocolates com avelãs
tr: Fındıklı çikolata

en: Chocolates with raisins
bg: Шоколад със стафиди
da: Chokolader med rosiner
fr: Chocolats aux raisins
hr: Čokolade s grožđicama
ja: レーズンチョコレート
lt: Šokoladai su razinomis
sv: Choklader med russin

en: Chocolates with praline
fr: Chocolats à la praline
hr: Čokolade s pralinama
ja: プラリネチョコレート

en: Rice chocolates
fr: Chocolats au riz
hr: Rižine čokolade
it: Cioccolato con riso
lt: Šokoladai su pūstais ryžiais
nl: Chocola met gepofte rijst

en: Cereal chocolates
bg: Шоколади с житни зърна
da: Chokolade med korn
de: Getreideschokolade
es: Chocolates de cereales
fi: Viljasuklaatit
fr: Chocolats aux céréales
hr: Čokolade od žitarica
hu: Gabonapehelyes csokoládék
it: Cioccolato con cereali
ja: シリアルチョコレート
lt: Dribsnių šokoladai
nl: Chocola met granen
pl: Czekolada zbożowa
pt: Chocolates com cereais
ru: Шоколад с злаками
sv: Choklad med spannmål
tr: Tahıllı çikolata
zh: 谷物巧克力

en: White chocolates, White chocolate
bg: Бял шоколад
da: Hvide chokolader, hvid chokolade
de: Weiße Schokoladen
es: Chocolates blancos
fi: valkosuklaat
fr: Chocolats blancs, chocolat blanc, chocolats blonds, chocolat blond
hr: Bijele čokolade
hu: Fehércsokoládék
it: Cioccolati bianchi, Cioccolato bianco
ja: ホワイトチョコレート
lt: Balti šokoladai, baltas šokoladas
nl: Witte chocoladen
pl: Czekolada biała
pt: Chocolates brancos
ru: Белый шоколад
sv: Vit choklad
tr: Beyaz çikolata
zh: 白巧克力

en: White chocolate bars
fr: Chocolat blanc en tablette, Tablette de chocolat blanc

en: White chocolates with sweeteners
bg: Бял шоколад с подсладители
de: Weiße Schokoladen mit Süßungsmitteln
es: Chocolates blancos con edulcorantes
fr: Chocolats blancs édulcorés, Chocolats blancs aux édulcorants
hr: Bijele čokolade sa zaslađivačima
hu: Csokoládék édesítőszerekkel
it: Cioccolato bianco con edulcorante
lt: Balti šokoladai su saldikliais
nl: Witte chocola met zoetstoffen

en: White chocolate with coconut pieces
de: Weiße Schokoladen mit Kokos, Weiße Schokoladen mit Kokosnuss
fr: Chocolats blancs à la noix de coco
hr: Bijela čokolada s komadićima kokosa
hu: Fehér csokoládé kókusszal
it: Cioccolato bianco al cocco
lt: Balti šokoladai su kokoso gabaliukais